Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.5315, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disposition. (a) deleted text begin Subject to paragraph (b),deleted text end If the court finds under section 609.5313, 609.5314, or 609.5318 that the property is subject to forfeiture, it shall order the appropriate agency to do one of the following: (1) unless a different disposition is provided under clause (3) or (4), deleted text begin eitherdeleted text end destroy firearms, ammunition, and firearm accessories that the agency decides not to use for law enforcement purposes under clause (8)deleted text begin , or sell them to federally licensed firearms dealers, as defined in section 624.7161, subdivision 1, and distribute the proceeds under subdivision 5 or 5bdeleted text end ; (2) sell property that is not required to be destroyed by law and is not harmful to the public and distribute the proceeds under subdivision 5 or 5b; (3) sell antique firearms, as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 3, to the public and distribute the proceeds under subdivision 5 or 5b; (4) destroy or use for law enforcement purposes semiautomatic military-style assault weapons, as defined in section 624.712, subdivision 7; (5) take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law; (6) forward the property to the federal drug enforcement administration; (7) disburse money as provided under subdivision 5, 5b, or 5c; or (8) keep property other than money for official use by the agency and the prosecuting agency. deleted text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the Hennepin or Ramsey County sheriff may not sell firearms, ammunition, or firearms accessories if the policy is disapproved by the applicable county board. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end If property is sold under paragraph (a), the appropriate agency shall not sell property to: (1) an officer or employee of the agency that seized the property or to a person related to the officer or employee by blood or marriage; or (2) the prosecuting authority or any individual working in the same office or a person related to the authority or individual by blood or marriage. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Sales of forfeited property under this section must be conducted in a commercially reasonable manner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end